Louisiana, session 2026, HB130.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) The elevated portion of Interstate 220 from South Lakeshore Drive to
Hilry Huckaby III Avenue in Shreveport, Louisiana, Caddo Parish shall be known and is
hereby redesignated as the "American Legion Post No. 14 Memorial Bridge".
(B) The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual cost for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
Section 2.(A) The portion of Louisiana Highway 173 beginning at the intersection
of Elder St. and North Holtzman Avenue, extending to Common St., all in Shreveport,
Louisiana, Caddo Parish shall be known and is hereby designated as the "Dr. Harry Blake,
Sr. Memorial Highway".
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 130 ENROLLED
(B) The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual cost for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2